Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5605
Reinsurance intermediary-broker; records; requirements.

For at least ten years after expiration of each contract of reinsurance transacted by a reinsurance intermediary-broker, the reinsurance intermediary-broker shall keep a complete record for each transaction showing:

(1) Type of contract, limits, underwriting restrictions, classes or risks, and territory;

(2) Period of coverage, including effective and expiration dates, cancellation provisions, and notice required of cancellation;

(3) Reporting and settlement requirements of balances;

(4) Rate used to compute the reinsurance premium;

(5) Names and addresses of assuming reinsurers;

(6) Rates of all reinsurance commissions, including the commissions on any retrocessions handled by the reinsurance intermediary-broker;

(7) Related correspondence and memoranda;

(8) Proof of placement;

(9) Details regarding retrocessions handled by the reinsurance intermediary-broker, including the identity of retrocessionaires and percentage of each contract assumed or ceded;

(10) Financial records, including premium and loss accounts; and

(11) When the reinsurance intermediary-broker procures a reinsurance contract on behalf of a ceding insurer:

(a) Directly from any assuming reinsurer, written evidence that the assuming reinsurer has agreed to assume the risk; or

(b) If placed through a representative of the assuming reinsurer other than an employee, written evidence that the assuming reinsurer has delegated binding authority to the representative.

The insurer shall have access to and the right to copy and audit all accounts and records maintained by the reinsurance intermediary-broker related to its business in a form usable by the insurer.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 59.